Hawaii statutes.
§712-1231 Social gambling; definition and
specific conditions, affirmative defense. (a) Definition. "Social
gambling" means gambling in which all of the following conditions are
present:

(1) Players compete on equal terms with each other;
and

(2) No player receives, or becomes entitled to
receive, anything of value or any profit, directly or indirectly, other than
the player's personal gambling winnings; and

(3) No other person, corporation, unincorporated
association, or entity receives or becomes entitled to receive, anything of
value or any profit, directly or indirectly, from any source, including but not
limited to permitting the use of premises, supplying refreshments, food,
drinks, service, lodging or entertainment; and

(4) It is not conducted or played in or at a hotel,
motel, bar, nightclub, cocktail lounge, restaurant, massage parlor, billiard
parlor, or any business establishment of any kind, public parks, public
buildings, public beaches, school grounds, churches or any other public area;
and

(5) None of the players is below the age of majority;
and

(6) The gambling activity is not bookmaking.

(b) Affirmative defense:

(1) In any prosecution for an offense described in
[section] 712-1223, 712-1224, 712-1225 or 712-1226, a defendant may assert the
affirmative defense that the gambling activity in question was a social
gambling game as defined in [section] 712-1231(a).

(2) If the defendant asserts the affirmative defense,
the defendant shall have the burden of going forward with evidence to prove the
facts constituting such defense unless such facts are supplied by the testimony
of the prosecuting witness or circumstance in such testimony, and of proving
such facts by a preponderance of evidence.

(c) In any prosecution for an offense described
in this part the fact that the gambling activity involved was other than a
social gambling game shall not be an element of the offense to be proved by the
prosecution in making out its prima facie case. [L 1973, c 201, pt of §1; gen
ch 1993]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1231

Section 712-1231 is a completely new and rewritten section
set forth by Act 201, Session Laws 1973. This section defines "social
gambling" as gambling activity that meets all the prescribed conditions.
These conditions are: (1) that all players engage as contestants on "equal
terms"; (2) that no profiting be involved--other than the player's
winnings; (3) that it should not be conducted at certain enumerated places,
such as hotels, school grounds, public parks, any business establishment, etc.;
(4) that no minor be involved in the game; and (5) that the gambling activity
is not bookmaking. (Senate Standing Committee Report No. 806 (1973).)

With respect to the concept of prohibiting gambling in
enumerated places, the Standing Committee Report states:

Your Committee notes the addition of
the concept that gambling in certain enumerated places such as hotels, public
parks, etc.-- is prohibited and that gambling conducted in such places is not
to come within the protected confines of 'social gambling.' It is felt that
this addition to the law clarifies the legislature's intent to prevent the
intrusion of hotel and casino type operations into this State, as well as
prevent exposure of gambling to children in public parks, school grounds, etc.

In this connection, casual gambling
activities in a social context, involving contests of skill, and conducted in
places other than those enumerated in the law, such as casual bets between
golfers or bowlers would be "social gambling".

Section 712-1231 provides that in any prosecution for an
offense described in §712-1223, 1224, 1225, or 1226, the defendant may assert
the affirmative defense that the gambling activity was a social gambling game
as defined in this section. In respect thereto, the Standing Committee Report
No. 806 (1973), Senate Judiciary Committee, states:

There has been considerable concern
whether the affirmative defense provisions of the Hawaii Penal Code are
constitutional. In that regard, your Committee understands that statutorily
prescribed affirmative defenses have been held constitutional. See Territory
of Hawaii v. Shizuichi Yamamoto, et. al., 39 Haw. 556 (1952); McKelvey v.
United States, 260 U.S. 353 (1922); United States v. Sidney B. Rowlette, et.
al., 297 F.2d 475 (1968); and U.S. v. Carl Oslin Rumzy, Jr. 446 F.2d 1184
(1971).

A major change affected is the
erasure of any mandatory requirement that the defendant utilize this
affirmative defense. We note that this is an area of great concern. That is,
whether the affirmative defense in the existing law forces the defendant, as a
legal requirement, to testify in potential self-incrimination.

Without addressing ourselves to any
other application of the affirmative defense in the Hawaii Penal Code, your
Committee notes the existing law was to provide in §712-1231(b) that a
defendant's resort to the affirmative defense is discretionary. See People v.
Felder, 334 N.Y.S. 2d 992 (1972).

There appears to be some confusion
as to the prosecutor's burden of proof in relation to the defense of social
gambling. It is intended that the prosecution should not have the burden of
proving as part of its prima facie case, that the gambling activity in question
was other than a social gambling game. Accordingly, an explicit statement to
that effect was included in §712-1231(c).

In contrast, it is the intent that
the defendant shall be entitled to acquittal on the basis of the affirmative
defense only if the trier of the facts finds by a preponderance of the evidence
the facts constituting the affirmative defense. In other words, the defendant
has both the burden of going forward with the evidence and the burden of
persuasion by a preponderance of evidence with respect to the affirmative
defense of social gambling.

Case Notes

Defendants did not prove that no person other than players
received or became entitled to receive anything of value. 2 H. App. 606, 638
P.2d 338 (1981).

Although it may have been error admitting into evidence, as
expert opinion under HRE rule 702, officer's testimony concerning subsection
(b), the social gambling defense, where defendant was not entitled to this
defense in a prosecution for promoting gambling in the first degree under
§712-1221(1)(c), error was harmless. 92 H. 98 (App.), 987 P.2d 996 (1999).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next